Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 8
ELECTIONS

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1981, and this part 8 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 8 prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the article heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers prior to 1992 are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

32-1-801. Legislative declaration - applicability.

It is hereby declared that the orderly conduct of elections of special districts will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, security, and general welfare of the people of the state of Colorado. Therefore, all elections shall be held pursuant to articles 1 to 13.5 of title 1, C.R.S., unless otherwise provided.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 884, § 122, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 787, § 89, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-801 as it existed prior to 1992.

32-1-802. Acts and elections conducted pursuant to provisions which refer to qualified electors.

Any elections, and any acts relating thereto, carried out under this part 8, which were conducted prior to July 1, 1987, pursuant to provisions which referred to a qualified elector rather than an eligible elector and which were valid when conducted, shall be deemed and held to be legal and valid in all respects.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 884, § 122, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-801.5 as it existed prior to 1992.

32-1-803. Acts and elections conducted pursuant to provisions which refer to registered electors.

Any elections and any acts relating to those elections, carried out under this part 8 which were conducted prior to July 1, 1992, and which were valid when conducted, shall be held to be legal and valid in all respects.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 884, § 122, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-801.5 as it existed prior to 1992.

32-1-803.5. Organizational election - new special district.

At any election for the organization of a new special district, the court shall also order the submission of the proposition of issuing general obligation bonds or creating other general obligation indebtedness or any question or questions necessary to implement section 20 of article X of the state constitution as applied to the new special district, if the petition filed pursuant to section 32-1-301 requests that such questions be submitted at the organizational election. The order of the court shall make the determinations required by section 32-1-1101 (2) and (3)(a) and require the designated election official appointed by the court pursuant to section 32-1-305.5 (1) to conduct the election in accordance with section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1439, § 136, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 71, § 31, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This provision was added by House Bill 93-1255, chapter 258, Session Laws of Colorado 1993, as section 32-1-802 (6) but was renumbered on revision to give proper effect and location.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

32-1-804. Board to conduct elections - combined election - time for special election.

After a special district is organized and the first board is elected, the board shall govern the conduct of all subsequent regular and special elections of the special district and shall render all interpretations and make all decisions as to controversies or other matters arising in the conduct of the elections. The board in its discretion, but no more frequently than every four years, may reestablish the boundaries of director districts created pursuant to section 32-1-301 (2)(f) so that the director districts have, as nearly as possible, the same number of eligible electors.

All powers and authority granted to the board by this part 8 for the conduct of regular or special elections may be exercised in the absence of the board by the secretary or by an assistant secretary appointed by the board. The person named by the board who is responsible for the conducting of the election shall be the designated election official.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 884, § 122, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-803 as it existed prior to 1992.

32-1-804.1. Call for nominations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 449, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 77, § 51, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

32-1-804.3. Candidates for director - self-nomination and acceptance form. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 449, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2011:

(4) amended, (HB 11-1124), ch. 105, p. 328, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 77, § 51, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

32-1-805. Time for holding elections - type of election - manner of election - notice. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 885, § 122, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1195, § 100, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 859, § 109, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 922, § 2, effective May 17; (1) amended and (4) added, p. 1191, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(5) added, (SB 09-087), ch. 325, p. 1732, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 2011:

(5)(b) amended and (5)(b.5) and (5)(b.7) added, (SB 11-057), ch. 123, p. 385, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2013:

(5)(a) repealed and (5)(b) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, pp. 752, 751, §§ 138, 133, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 77, § 51, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 32-1-803 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

32-1-805.5. Ranked voting methods.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, a special district may use a ranked voting method, as defined in section 1-1-104 (34.4), C.R.S., to conduct a regular election to elect directors of the special district in accordance with section 1-7-1003, C.R.S., and the rules adopted by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-7-1004 (1), C.R.S.

A special district conducting an election using a ranked voting method may adapt the requirements of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., including requirements concerning the form of the ballot, the method of marking the ballot, the procedure for counting ballots, and the form of the election judges' certificate, as necessary for compatibility with the ranked voting method.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1253, § 5, effective August 5.

32-1-806. Persons entitled to vote at special district elections.

No person shall be permitted to vote in any election unless that person is an eligible elector as defined in section 32-1-103 (5)(a).

Any person desiring to vote at any election as an eligible elector pursuant to section 32-1-103 (5)(a)(II) shall sign a self-affirmation that the person is an elector of the special district. The self-affirming oath or affirmation must be on a form that contains in substance the following:

For electors who vote at any election by mail ballot, the affidavit on the envelope of the ballot as required by title 1, C.R.S., may be substituted for the self-affirming oath or affirmation required by subsection (2) of this section.

A person who completes the self-affirming oath or affirmation required by subsection (2) of this section shall be permitted to vote, unless such person's right to vote is challenged.

"I,

(printed name)

, who reside at

(address)

, am an elector of this

(name of special district)

district and desire to vote at this election. I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am registered to vote in the state of Colorado and qualified to vote in this special district election as:
_____ A resident of the district or area to be included in the district; or
_____ The owner of taxable real or personal property situated within the boundaries of the special district or area to be included within the special district; or
_____ A person who is obligated to pay taxes under a contract to purchase taxable property in the special district or the area to be included within the special district; or
_____ The spouse or civil union partner of

(name of spouse or civil union partner)

who is the owner of taxable real or personal property situated within the boundaries of the special district or area to be included within the special district.
I have not voted previously at this election.
Date ___________________
Signature of elector ________________________."

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 885, § 122, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1439, § 137, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1195, § 101, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3) added, p. 859, § 110, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1772, § 74, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1798, § 72, effective June 1.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 75, § 46, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 592, § 79, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-804 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For the requirement of registration before voting in a primary, general, or congressional vacancy election, see § 1-2-201.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

32-1-807. Nonapplicability of criminal penalties.

Election offenses and penalties prescribed by parts 2 and 3 of article 13 of title 1, C.R.S., do not apply to elections authorized under this title.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 885, § 122, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-833 as it existed prior to 1992.

32-1-808. Transfer of property title to qualify electors - limitations - validation.

No person shall knowingly take or place title to taxable property in the name of another or enter into a contract to purchase or sell taxable property for the purpose of attempting to qualify such person as an eligible elector at any special district election. Any ballot cast in violation of this subsection (1) as determined in an election contest conducted pursuant to article 13.5 of title 1, C.R.S., shall be void.

No person shall aid or assist any person in doing any of the acts described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

A person may take or place title to taxable property in the name of another or enter into a contract to purchase or sell taxable property for the purpose of attempting to qualify such person as an eligible elector for any special district election under the following circumstances:

A vacancy exists on the board of the special district and, within ten days of the publication of notice of such vacancy, no otherwise qualified eligible elector files a letter of interest in filling such position with the board;

In any organizational election at which there are more than ten eligible electors, on or after the second day before the filing deadline for self-nomination and acceptance forms or letters pursuant to section 32-1-305.5 (4), the number of otherwise qualified eligible electors who have filed such self-nomination and acceptance forms or letters is less than the number of special district director offices to be voted upon at such election;

There are less than eleven eligible electors as of any date before an organizational election; or

On or after the day after the filing deadline for self-nomination and acceptance forms or letters pursuant to section 1-13.5-303, C.R.S., before any regular special district election, the number of otherwise qualified eligible electors who have filed self-nomination and acceptance forms or letters pursuant to section 1-13.5-303, C.R.S., is less than the number of special district director offices to be voted upon at the election.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person shall place title to taxable property in the name of another or enter into a contract to sell taxable property for the purpose of attempting to qualify more than the number of persons who are necessary to be eligible electors in order to:

Fill a vacancy on a board except as permitted by the provisions of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2); or

Become a candidate for director in a special district election except as permitted by the provisions of subparagraphs (II), (III), and (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

The incidental qualification of the spouse of a person as an eligible elector pursuant to section 32-1-103 (5)(a)(II) shall not constitute a qualification of more than the number of persons necessary to be eligible electors under subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b).

It shall not constitute a violation of subsection (1) of this section for a person to take or place title to taxable property in the name of another or to enter into a contract to purchase or sell taxable property in substitution of property acquired in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

Any person who is an eligible elector as of July 1, 2006, or who has been qualified as an eligible elector under this section shall remain qualified as an eligible elector until such time as such person ceases to meet the qualifications set forth in section 32-1-103 (5).

Any person elected to a board whose qualification as an eligible elector is not challenged and overturned in accordance with the requirements specified in article 13.5 of title 1, C.R.S., shall not be subject to further challenge based upon qualification as a property owner under this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary:

(I) The qualification of any person appointed or elected to a board prior to April 21, 2016, is hereby validated, ratified, and confirmed and may not be challenged, except as provided in this subsection (6), unless a contest was initiated prior to April 21, 2016.

(II) The qualification of any person appointed or elected to a board on May 3, 2016, is hereby validated, ratified, and confirmed and may not be challenged, except as provided in this subsection (6), unless a contest was initiated within the time period specified in section 1-11-213 or 1-13.5-1403, C.R.S., as applicable.

Except where a contest to the qualifications of a person to serve on a board has been timely initiated as described in this subsection (6), this subsection (6) validates, ratifies, and confirms the qualifications of any person appointed or elected to a board prior to May 3, 2016, notwithstanding any defects and irregularities in such qualifications. All actions undertaken by any board member who may not have been qualified to serve on the board when appointed or elected on or before May 3, 2016, shall be considered as actions of a de facto officer and director and as valid and effective.

Nothing in this subsection (6) is intended to limit challenges by legal proceedings in the nature of quo warranto to the continuing service of persons appointed or elected to a board who may no longer be eligible to serve in accordance with section 32-1-905 together with challenges to the actions of such board taken after initiation of those legal proceedings.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 135, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2014:

(2)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 75, § 47, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(5) amended and (6) added, (SB 16-211), ch. 174, p. 596, § 3, effective May 18; (1)(a) and (5) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 787, § 90, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (5) by SB 16-189 and SB 16-211 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 16-211, see section 1 of chapter 174, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

32-1-809. Notice to electors.

No more than sixty days prior to and not later than January 15 of each year, the board shall provide notice to the eligible electors of the special district in the manner set forth in subsection (2) of this section. The notice shall contain the following:

The address and telephone number of the principal business office of the special district;

The name and business telephone number of the manager or other primary contact person of the special district;

The names of and contact information for the members of the board, the name of the board chair, and the name of each member whose office will be on the ballot at the next regular special district election;

The times and places designated for regularly scheduled meetings of the board during the year and the place where notice of board meetings is posted pursuant to section 24-6-402 (2)(c), C.R.S.;

The current mill levy of the special district and the total ad valorem tax revenue received by the district during the last year;

The date of the next regular special district election at which members of the board will be elected;

Information on the procedure and time for an eligible elector of the special district to submit a self-nomination form for election to the board pursuant to section 1-13.5-303, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

The address of any website on which the special district's election results will be posted; and

Information on the procedure for an eligible elector to apply for a permanent absentee voter status as described in section 1-13.5-1003, C.R.S., with the special district.

The notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall be made in one or more of the following ways:

Mailing the notice separately to each household where one or more eligible electors of the special district resides;

Including the notice as a prominent part of a newsletter, annual report, billing insert, billing statement, letter, voter information card or other notice of election, or other informational mailing sent by the special district to the eligible electors of the special district;

Posting the information on the official website of the special district if there is a link to the district's website on the official website of the division;

For any district that is a member of a statewide association of special districts formed pursuant to section 29-1-401, C.R.S., by mailing or electronically transmitting the notice to the statewide association of special districts, which association shall post the notice on a publicly accessible section of the association's website; or

For a special district with less than one thousand eligible electors that is wholly located within a county with a population of less than thirty thousand, posting the notice in at least three public places within the limits of the special district and, in addition, posting a notice in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the special district is located. Such notices shall remain posted until the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of the following May.

A special district shall make a copy of the notice required by subsection (1) of this section available for public inspection at the principal business office of the special district.

Special districts with overlapping boundaries may combine the notices mailed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, so long as the information regarding each district is separately displayed and identified.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-087), ch. 325, p. 1733, § 5, effective September 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(h) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1)(g) amended and (1)(j) added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 71, § 32, effective February 18.

L. 2015:

(1)(c) and (3) amended, (HB 15-1092), ch. 87, p. 251, § 5, effective August 5.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsection (1)(h) was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.